District of Columbia statutes.
8-2001

Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter, the term:

(1)

“Animal control officer” means any employee or legally authorized agent of the District of Columbia (“District”) Animal Care and Control Agency as provided in § 8-1802.

(2)

“Carriage” means a device by which a person is transported or in which a person rides, for hire, and that is designed to be pulled or drawn by a horse in the horse-drawn carriage trade. The term “carriage” includes a wagon, cart, vehicle, or similar transportation device.

(3)

“Custodian” means a person who has the immediate possession, bailment, custody, use, or control of a horse. For the purposes of this chapter, the term “custodian” includes a driver.

(4)

“Drive” means the process of operating, transporting, driving, pulling, or hauling a horse-drawn carriage.

(5)

“Driver” means a person licensed to drive, steer, transport, or operate a carriage or horse used in the horse-drawn carriage trade.

(6)

“Driver’s license” means a valid document issued by the Mayor to operate a motor vehicle.

(7)

“Horse” means a large solid-hoofed herbivorous domesticated mammal or similar animal that belongs to the Equus caballus family and weighs at least 1,100 pounds, and that is used for the purpose of driving, pulling, or hauling a carriage, or for the purposes of a performance. For the purposes of this chapter, the term “horse” shall not include any animal owned by the District government or the United States government that is used solely for law enforcement purposes, or any animal in the custody of the National Zoological Park.

(8)

“Horse-drawn carriage trade” means a person or business that operates an enterprise, for hire, or as a contractual service, for the purpose of conveying persons or goods through the use of a horse to pull or haul a wagon, cart, carriage, vehicle, or similar device along the streets and byways in the District. The term “horse-drawn carriage trade” shall not include the use of a horse in a parade or in a funeral for which a permit is issued.

(9)

“Identification card” means a document devised, supplied, and certified by the Mayor of the District, and signed and dated by a licensed veterinarian which shall include:

(A)

The date of the last physical examination of the horse;

(B)

A description of the horse, including sex, age, height, color, markings, and any other information that may facilitate identification of the horse;

(C)

The stamina and physical condition of the horse;

(D)

Any condition that might restrict or affect the use or movement of the horse;

(E)

A photograph of the horse;

(F)

An identification number;

(G)

The name, address, and telephone number of the establishment where the horse is stabled; and

(H)

The name, address, and telephone number of the owner of the horse.

(10)

“License” means a valid permit or other document issued by the Mayor to a person or business for the purpose of operating a horse-drawn carriage trade enterprise.

(11)

“Licensed veterinarian” means a person who is licensed to practice veterinary medicine.

(12)

“Operator” means the proprietor or the agent of a proprietor of a horse-drawn carriage trade enterprise or a stable.

(13)

“Owner” means a person who is vested with the ownership, control, or title of a horse-drawn carriage trade, horse, or stable.

(14)

“Person” means an individual, firm, partnership, association, or group or combination acting in concert, whether as a principal, employer, employee, agent, servant, trustee, fiduciary, receiver, or any other type of legal or personal representative.

(15)

“Police officer” means a sworn member of the Metropolitan Police Department.

(16)

“Stable” means a barn, establishment, or similar appropriate facility where a horse is permanently or temporarily boarded, housed, or maintained.

Mar. 7, 1991, D.C. Law 8-224, § 2, 38 DCR 207
Dec. 5, 2008, D.C. Law 17-281, § 106, 55 DCR 9186
D.C. Law 17-281, in par. (1), substituted “Animal Care and Control Agency” for “Animal Control Agency”.
1981 Ed., § 6-1031.
This section is referenced in § 8-2004.